California, session 20252026, SB641.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide boards, bureaus, commissions, and regulatory entities within the jurisdiction of the Department of Consumer Affairs and the Department of Real Estate with authority to address licensing and enforcement concerns in real time after an emergency is declared.SEC. 2. Section 108.1 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:108.1. (a) To aid in the protection of the public health, the provision of patient care, the continuity of services, and to support impacted individuals, the Department of Real Estate or any board under the jurisdiction of the Department of Consumer Affairs, as specified in Section 101, may waive the application of any provision of law that the board or department is charged with enforcing for licensees and applicants who reside in or whose primary place of business is in a location damaged by a natural disaster for which a state of emergency is proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code or for which an emergency or major disaster is declared by the President of the United States, that is related to any of the following:(1) Requirements related to timing for taking examinations.(2) Extending licensure renewal deadlines.(3) Permitting license renewal without completing continuing education and postponing continuing education deadlines to a time after renewal.(4) Permitting license display requirements to include displaying a license verification printout from the boards’ websites during declared emergencies.(5) Permitting license renewal without paying the renewal fee and postponing payment of the renewal fee to a time after renewal.(6) Requirements to pay delinquency fees.(7) Extending the time for applicants to complete their applications before the application is considered abandoned.(b) (1) A board shall notify the director of the Department of Consumer Affairs in writing of any waiver approved by that board, and the waiver shall not take effect for a period of five business days after the director receives the notification from the board.(2) The director may approve or disapprove a waiver within five business days of receiving the notification from the board. The director shall notify the board of any decision to approve or disapprove a waiver within five business days of receiving the notification.(3) If the director disapproves a waiver, it shall not take effect. If the director approves a waiver, or the director fails to approve or disapprove a waiver within five business days of receiving the notification, the waiver shall take effect the following day.(4) The Department of Consumer Affairs shall post each waiver that takes effect on its website and notify the appropriate legislative committees of each effective waiver issued by a board within the department.(c) (1) The authority specified in subdivision (a) shall extend through the duration of a declared federal, state, or local emergency or disaster and for either of the following, as determined by the board or the Department of Real Estate, if the extension will aid in the protection of the public health, the provision of patient care, the continuity of services, or the support of impacted individuals:(A) One year after the end of the declared emergency or disaster.(B) An additional period of time beyond one year after the end of the declared emergency or disaster, as determined by the board or the Department of Real Estate.(2) A waiver extension approved by a board is subject to notification and approval of the director, as specified in subdivision (b).SEC. 3. Section 122 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:122. (a) Except as specified in subdivision (b) or otherwise provided by law, the department and each of the boards, bureaus, committees, and commissions within the department may charge a fee for the processing and issuance of a duplicate copy of any certificate of licensure or other form evidencing licensure or renewal of licensure. The fee shall be in an amount sufficient to cover all costs incident to the issuance of the duplicate certificate or other form but shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).(b) This section shall not apply to a licensee who resides in or whose primary place of business is in a location damaged by a natural disaster for which a state of emergency is proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code or for which an emergency or major disaster is declared by the President of the United States.SEC. 4. Section 136 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:136. (a) Each person holding a license, certificate, registration, permit, or other authority to engage in a profession or occupation issued by a board within the department shall notify the issuing board at its principal office of any change in the person’s mailing address within 30 days after the change, unless the board has specified by regulations a shorter time period.(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided by law, failure of a licensee to comply with the requirement in subdivision (a) constitutes grounds for the issuance of a citation and administrative fine, if the board has the authority to issue citations and administrative fines.(2) This section shall not apply to a licensee whose home or business mailing address is located in a location damaged by a natural disaster for which a state of emergency is proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code or for which an emergency or major disaster is declared by the President of the United States.SEC. 5. Section 136.5 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:136.5. Every applicant for licensure and every licensee of a board under the jurisdiction of the Department of Consumer Affairs, as specified in Section 101, shall provide the board with an email address.SEC. 6. Section 7058.9 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:7058.9. (a) Notwithstanding Section 40520 of the Public Resources Code, a contractor shall not engage in debris removal unless the contractor has one of the following licenses or classifications:(1) A - General Engineering Contractor. (2) B - General Building Contractor.(3) C-12 Earthwork and Paving and C-21 Building Moving/Demolition.(b) During a declared federal, state, or local emergency or for a declared disaster area due to a natural disaster, the registrar may authorize additional classifications to perform debris removal, including muck out services, based on the needs of the declared emergency or disaster. The registrar may make the determination on a case-by-case basis and without requiring regulations.(c) Any licensee authorized to perform debris removal pursuant to this section shall have passed an approved hazardous substance certification examination and shall comply with the hazardous waste operations and emergency response requirements pursuant to Section 5192 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.SEC. 7. Section 10089 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:10089. Immediately upon the declaration of a natural disaster for which a state of emergency is proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code or for which an emergency or major disaster is declared by the President of the United States, the commissioner, in consultation with other agencies and departments, as appropriate, shall do the following:(a) Expeditiously, and until one year following the end of the emergency, determine the nature and scope of any unlawful, unfair, or fraudulent practices employed by any individual or entity seeking to take advantage of property owners in the wake of the emergency.(b) Provide notice to the public of the nature of these practices, their rights under the law, relevant resources that may be available, and contact information for authorities to whom violations may be reported.SEC. 8. Section 10176 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:10176. The commissioner may, upon their own motion, and shall, upon the verified complaint in writing of any person, investigate the actions of any person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of a real estate licensee within this state, and the commissioner may temporarily suspend or permanently revoke a real estate license at any time where the licensee, while a real estate licensee, in performing or attempting to perform any of the acts within the scope of this chapter has been guilty of any of the following:(a) Making any substantial misrepresentation.(b) Making any false promises of a character likely to influence, persuade, or induce.(c) A continued and flagrant course of misrepresentation or making of false promises through licensees.(d) Acting for more than one party in a transaction without the knowledge or consent of all parties thereto.(e) Commingling with their own money or property the money or other property of others that is received and held by the licensee.(f) Claiming, demanding, or receiving a fee, compensation, or commission under any exclusive agreement authorizing a licensee to perform any acts set forth in Section 10131 for compensation or commission where the agreement does not contain a definite, specified date of final and complete termination.(g) The claiming or taking by a licensee of any secret or undisclosed amount of compensation, commission, or profit or the failure of a licensee to reveal to the buyer or seller contracting with the licensee the full amount of the licensee’s compensation, commission, or profit under any agreement authorizing the licensee to do any acts for which a license is required under this chapter for compensation or commission prior to or coincident with the signing of an agreement evidencing the meeting of the minds of the contracting parties, regardless of the form of the agreement, whether evidenced by documents in an escrow or by any other or different procedure.(h) The use by a licensee of any provision, which allows the licensee an option to purchase, in an agreement with a buyer or seller that authorizes the licensee to sell, buy, or exchange real estate or a business opportunity for compensation or commission, except when the licensee, prior to or coincident with election to exercise the option to purchase, reveals in writing to the buyer or seller the full amount of the licensee’s profit and obtains the written consent of the buyer or seller approving the amount of the profit.(i) Any other conduct, whether of the same or of a different character than specified in this section, which constitutes fraud or dishonest dealing.(j) Obtaining the signature of a prospective buyer to an agreement which provides that the prospective buyer shall either transact the purchasing, leasing, renting, or exchanging of a business opportunity property through the broker obtaining the signature, or pay a compensation to the broker if the property is purchased, leased, rented, or exchanged without the broker first having obtained the written authorization of the owner of the property concerned to offer the property for sale, lease, exchange, or rent.(k) Failing to disburse funds in accordance with a commitment to make a mortgage loan that is accepted by the applicant when the real estate broker represents to the applicant that the broker is either of the following:(1) The lender.(2) Authorized to issue the commitment on behalf of the lender or lenders in the mortgage loan transaction.(l) Intentionally delaying the closing of a mortgage loan for the sole purpose of increasing interest, costs, fees, or charges payable by the borrower.(m) Violating any section, division, or article of law which provides that a violation of that section, division, or article of law by a licensed person is a violation of that person’s licensing law, if it occurs within the scope of that person’s duties as a licensee.(n) (1) Until one year following the declaration of a natural disaster for which a state of emergency is proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code or for which an emergency or major disaster is declared by the President of the United States, making an unsolicited offer to an owner of real property, on their own behalf or on behalf of another, to purchase or otherwise acquire any interest in the real property, when that property is located in an area included in a declared federal, state, or local emergency or disaster, for an amount less than the fair market value of the property or interest in the property, as that value was the calendar day before the emergency or disaster.(2) The commissioner may extend the applicability of this subdivision for one additional year, for a total of two years following the declaration of a federal, state, or local emergency or disaster, if the commissioner deems it necessary for the protection of property owners and consumers.(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “fair market value” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1263.320 of the Code of Civil Procedure.SEC. 9. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to support licensed professionals impacted by the disasters caused by the Palisades and Eaton wildfires, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.